orthography.foma
      define Vowels [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z];

      #--------------------------------#
      # allow upper/lower case letters #
      #--------------------------------#

      define Lowercase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ,Ã (->) ã,Ĩ (->) ĩ,Õ (->) õ,Ẽ (->) ẽ,Ê (->) ê,Î (->) î,Ô (->) ô,À (->) à];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ,ã (->) Ã,ĩ (->) Ĩ,õ (->) Õ,ẽ (->) Ẽ,ê (->) Ê,î (->) Î,ô (->) Ô,à (->) À];

      ##########################
      #        Ortography      #
      # Normalization Patterns #
      #                        #
      ##########################

      define QUIReplacement [ {ky} (->) {qui} || _ [a|á] ];

      define QYReplacement1 [ {ky} (->) {qy} || _ [a|á] ]; # qyaaryo -> kyaaryo 
      define QYReplacement2 [ {ki} (->) {qy} || _ [a|á] ]; # niyanqyaaqui -> niyankiaaki 

      define RYReplacement1 [ {ri} -> {ry}, {ri} -> {ri} || _ [a|á] ]; # ijananeryaate Pava -> ihananeriaate Pava 

      define QUReplacement [ {k} (->) {qu} || _ [e|i|é|í] ,, {k} (->) {qü} || _ [e|i|é|í] ];

      define CReplacement1 [ {k} (->) {c} || _ [a|o|u|á|é|í] ];
      define CReplacement2 [ {k} (->) {c} || [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í] _ .#. ]; ! shac -> shak ; tac -> tak 
                                                                        ! tec -> tek 
                                                                        ! tzinic -> tzinik 
      define CReplacement3 [ {nk} -> {nc}, {nk} -> {nk} || [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í] _ .#. ]; ! eenc -> eenk 
	  
      #define QYReplacement [ {ky} (->) {qy} || _ [a] ];

      define JReplacement1 [ {h} (->) {j} || Vowels _ Vowels ]; # not accepting sh -> sj 
      define JReplacement2 [ {h} (->) {j} || .#. _ Vowels ]; # changing ja -> ha at the beginning of a word
      define JReplacement3 [ {h} (->) {j} || _ Vowels ]; # changing jemimimi -> jemimimi at the beginning of a word
      define JReplacement4 [ {h} (->) {j} || _ [{ya}|{yi}] ]; # iraanajya -> iraanahya ; aajyitataantsi -> aahyitataantsi
      define JReplacement5 [ {h} (->) {j} || [{o}] _ [{ya}] ]; # Ojyakaawintachari

      define ZReplacement1 [ {s} (->) {z} || .#. _ Vowels ];

      define BReplacement1 [ {v} (->) {b} || _ Vowels ];
      define BReplacement2 [ {nv} (->) {mb} || _ Vowels ];
      define WReplacement [ {v} (->) {w} || _ [Vowels|y] ]; ! owyaare 
      define HUReplacement [ {v} (->) {hu} || _ [i|o] ]; ! kuhuinco -> kuvinco, shihuonso -> shivonso

      define PIReplacement [ {py} (->) {pi} || _ [a|á] ];
      define KIReplacement [ {ky} (->) {ki} || _ [a|á] ,, {ky} (->) {qy} || _ [a|á] ]; 
      define KIReplacement2 [ {ky} -> {ki}, {ky} -> {ky} || _ [e|é] ]; 
      define RIReplacement [ {ry} (->) {ri} || _ [a|á] ];

      define TIReplacement [ {ty} -> {ti}, {ty} -> {ty} || _ [e|é] ];

      # define THReplacement [ {ts} (->) {th} || _ [a|e|i|o|á|é|í|ó] ]; # xfst only ! thamiri -> tsamiri 
      define THReplacement [ {ts} -> {th}, {ts} -> {ts} || _ [a|e|i|o|á|é|í|ó] ];

      define NYReplacement [ {ny} (->) {ñ} || _ Vowels ];

      # GRAVE ACCENT
      # À à
      define VowelsWithGraveAccent [ {a} (->) {à} ];      
      define VowelsWithAccent [ {a} (->) {á}, {e} (->) {é}, {e} (->) {è}, {i} (->) {í}, {i} (->) {ì},{o} (->) {ó},{o} (->) {ò}, {u} (->) {ú}];

      define UReplacement1 [ {o} (->) {u} || [Cons] _ [Cons] ]; # ayumpari, kubantsi
      define UReplacement2 [ {o} (->) {u} || [Cons] _ [a|e] ]; # kuakitzi, wuempo , kuaritotzi 
      define UReplacement3 [ {o} (->) {u} || [Cons] _ ]; # paju
      define UReplacement4 [ {o} (->) {u} || .#. _ [Cons] ]; # upempe 
      
      define NPReplacement [ {mp} (->) {np} || [Vowels] _ [Vowels] ]; # amenpori
      
      define RYReplacement [ {i} (->) {y} || [{r}] _ .#. ]; # -ry -> -ri 
      define TSYReplacement [ {i} (->) {y} || [{ts}] _ .#. ]; # -tsy -> -tsi 
      
      # onset before vowel a 
      define TYOnset1 [ {tey} -> {ty}, {tey} -> {tey} || _ [a|á] ]; ! tyaaki 'flower' -> teyaaki 
      define TYOnset2 [ {tiy} -> {ty}, {tiy} -> {tiy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! tyaaki 'flower' -> tiyaaki 
	define TYOnset3 [ {ti} -> {ty} || {n} _ [a|á] ]; ! ròmahontiáantakariri -> ròmahontyáantakariri
      define PYOnset [ {piy} -> {py}, {piy} -> {piy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! pyari 'masato [manioc beer]' -> piyari 
      define SYOnset [ {siy} -> {sy}, {siy} -> {siy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! syatatsi 'claw, fingernail' -> siyatatsi 
      define TSYOnset [ {tsiy} -> {tsy}, {tsiy} -> {tsiy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! tsyairi 'paucar sp.' -> tsiyairi 
      define NYOnset [ {niy} -> {ny}, {niy} -> {niy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! kanyari 'green' -> kaniyari 
      define KYOnset [ {kiy} -> {ky}, {kiy} -> {kiy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! chochokyari -> chochokiyari 
	define VYOnset1 [ {vi} -> {vy} || _ [a|á] ]; ! áawianèro -> áawyanèro 
	define VYOnset2 [ {wi} -> {wy} || _ [a|á] ];
      define MYOnset1 [ {mi} -> {my} || _ [a|á] ]; ! ishèmiakotáshitawo -> ishèmyakotáshitawo
      
      # ------------------------------------------
      # Seen in Ashanĩka do Rio Amônia
      # ------------------------------------------
      # diphthong: ay 
      # wayro , DURATIVE suffix 
      define AYDiphthong1 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [v] _ [Cons] ];
      define AYDiphthong2 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [v] _ .#. ];
      # osaykanake 
      define AYDiphthong3 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [s] _ [Cons] ];
      define AYDiphthong4 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [s] _ .#. ];
      # TAYRI  
      define AYDiphthong5 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [t] _ [Cons] ];
      define AYDiphthong6 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [t] _ .#. ];
      # iranay 
      define AYDiphthong7 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [n] _ [Cons] ];
      define AYDiphthong8 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [n] _ .#. ];
      # athatane-payni
      define AYDiphthong9 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [p] _ [Cons] ];
      define AYDiphthong10 [ {ai} (->) {ay} || [p] _ .#. ];
      # 
      define EYDiphthong1 [ {ei} (->) {ey} || [t] _ [Cons] ];
      # apaniroyni 
      define OYDiphthong1 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [r] _ [Cons] ]; ! add {n} ??? 
      define OYDiphthong2 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [r] _ .#. ];
      # Mawoyni
      define OYDiphthong3 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [v] _ [Cons] ]; 
      define OYDiphthong4 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [v] _ .#. ]; 
      # Nokoy 
      define OYDiphthong5 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [k] _ [Cons] ]; 
      define OYDiphthong6 [ {oi} (->) {oy} || [k] _ .#. ]; 
      # Brazilian variant 
      # tilde (1) : ~ 
      define ATildeReplacement1 [ {an} -> {ã}, {an} -> {an} || _ [k|t] ];
      define ATildeReplacement2 [ {am} -> {ã}, {am} -> {am} || _ [p] ];
      define ETildeReplacement1 [ {en} -> {ẽ}, {en} -> {en} || _ [k|t] ];
      define ETildeReplacement2 [ {em} -> {ẽ}, {em} -> {em} || _ [p] ];
      define ITildeReplacement1 [ {in} -> {ĩ}, {in} -> {in} || _ [k|t] ];
      define ITildeReplacement2 [ {im} -> {ĩ}, {im} -> {im} || _ [p] ];
      define OTildeReplacement1 [ {on} -> {õ}, {on} -> {on} || _ [k|t] ];
      define OTildeReplacement2 [ {om} -> {õ}, {om} -> {om} || _ [p] ];
      # 
      # 
      define NYTildeReplacement1 [ {in} (->) {ĩ} || _ [y] ];
      define NYTildeReplacement2 [ {on} (->) {õ} || _ [y] ];
      # ------------------------------------------

      define Orthography [ QUIReplacement 
.o. QYReplacement1 .o. QYReplacement2 .o. RYReplacement1 
.o. QUReplacement .o. CReplacement1 .o. CReplacement2 .o. CReplacement3  
.o. AYDiphthong1 .o. AYDiphthong2 .o. AYDiphthong3 .o. AYDiphthong4 .o. AYDiphthong5 .o. AYDiphthong6 .o. AYDiphthong7 .o. AYDiphthong8 .o. AYDiphthong9 .o. AYDiphthong10 
.o. EYDiphthong1 
.o. OYDiphthong1 .o. OYDiphthong2 .o. OYDiphthong3 .o. OYDiphthong4 .o. OYDiphthong5 .o. OYDiphthong6 
.o. JReplacement1 .o. JReplacement2 .o. JReplacement3 .o. JReplacement4  .o. JReplacement5 
.o. ZReplacement1 
.o. BReplacement1 .o. BReplacement2 .o. WReplacement .o. HUReplacement  
.o. PIReplacement .o. KIReplacement .o. KIReplacement2 .o. RIReplacement .o. TIReplacement .o. THReplacement .o. NYReplacement .o. VowelsWithAccent .o. VowelsWithGraveAccent 
.o. ATildeReplacement1 .o. ATildeReplacement2 .o. ETildeReplacement1 .o. ETildeReplacement2 .o. ITildeReplacement1 .o. ITildeReplacement2 .o. OTildeReplacement1 .o. OTildeReplacement2 
.o. NYTildeReplacement1 .o. NYTildeReplacement2 
.o. UReplacement1 .o. UReplacement2 .o. UReplacement3 .o. UReplacement4  
.o. NPReplacement .o. RYReplacement .o. TSYReplacement 
.o. TYOnset1 .o. TYOnset2 .o. TYOnset3 .o. PYOnset .o. KYOnset .o. VYOnset1 .o. VYOnset2 .o. MYOnset1 
]; 
